Utah statutes.
26-8a-304.   Permits for emergency medical service vehicles.

(1)  To ensure that emergency medical service vehicles are adequately staffed, safe, maintained, and properly equipped, the committee shall establish permit requirements at levels it considers appropriate in the following categories:

(a)  ambulance; and

(b)  emergency response vehicle.

(2)  The department shall, based on the requirements established in Subsection (1), issue permits to emergency medical service vehicles.



Enacted by Chapter 141, 1999 General Session

